Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.620

Review of proposed rules—Notice.

If the rules review committee finds by a majority vote of its members that a proposed rule is not within the intent of the legislature as expressed in the statute which the rule implements, or that an agency may not be adopting a proposed rule in accordance with all applicable provisions of law, the committee shall give the affected agency written notice of its decision. The notice shall be given at least seven days prior to any hearing scheduled for consideration of or adoption of the proposed rule pursuant to RCW 34.05.320. The notice shall include a statement of the review committee's findings and the reasons therefor. When the agency holds a hearing on the proposed rule, the agency shall consider the review committee's decision.

[ 1996 c 318 s 3; 1994 c 249 s 17; 1988 c 288 s 602; 1987 c 451 s 1; 1981 c 324 s 6. Formerly RCW 34.04.220.]

NOTES:

Severability—Application—1994 c 249: See notes following RCW 34.05.310.

Legislative affirmation—Severability—1981 c 324: See notes following RCW 34.05.010.